Arkansas, session 2025, SB551.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 3-8-805(a) and (b), concerning the signing
of a petition and the penalty for falsification for a local option election,
are amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) A person signing a petition under this subchapter shall:
(A) Be a registered voter; and
(B) Sign After reading the ballot title of the petition in
the presence of the canvasser or having the ballot title of the petition read
aloud to him or her in the presence of the canvasser, sign his or her own
name and print his or her own name, address, birthdate, and the date of
signing on a petition in his or her own handwriting.
(2) If a person signing a petition under subdivision (a)(1) of
this section requires assistance due to disability, another person:
(A) May print the name, address, birthdate, and the date
of signing; and
(B) Shall sign and print his or her name in the margin of
the petition.
*SSS272*
03/20/2025 4:20:24 PM SSS272

SB551
(3) A person who is under eighteen (18) years of age shall not
act as a canvasser.
(4) A person acting as a canvasser shall not obtain a signature
for a petition without disclosing to the potential petitioner that petition
fraud is a criminal offense before the potential petitioner signs the
petition in the custody of the canvasser by:
(A) Verbal notification; or
(B) If verbal notification is impossible, written
notification with a document that is provided separately from all other
petition materials.
(b) A person commits a Class A misdemeanor if the person, acting as a
canvasser, notary, sponsor, or agent of a sponsor knowingly:
(1) Signs a name other than his or her own to a petition;
(2) Prints a name, address, or birthdate other than his or her
own on a petition unless the signer requires assistance due to disability and
the person complies with this section;
(3) Solicits or obtains a signature to a petition knowing that
the person signing is not qualified to sign the petition;
(4) Pays a person any form of compensation in exchange for
signing a petition as a petitioner;
(5) Accepts or pays money or anything of value for obtaining
signatures on a petition when the person acting as a canvasser, sponsor, or
agent of a sponsor knows that the person acting as canvasser's name or
address is not included on the sponsor's list filed with the county clerk; or
(6) As a sponsor, files a petition part with the official
charged with verifying the signatures knowing that the petition part contains
one (1) or more false or fraudulent signatures unless each false or
fraudulent signature is clearly stricken by the sponsor before filing;
(7) As a canvasser, knowingly accepts a signature when the
person signing the petition has not read the ballot title of the petition in
the presence of the canvasser or the ballot title of the petition has not
been read aloud to the person in the presence of the canvasser; or
(8) As a canvasser, fails to disclose to a potential petitioner
that petition fraud is a criminal offense before the potential petitioner
signs the petition in the custody of the canvasser under subdivision (a)(4)
of this section.
03/20/2025 4:20:24 PM SSS272

SB551

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 3-8-805, concerning the signing of a
petition and penalty for falsification for a local option election, is
amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(d)(1) The county clerk shall not count signatures collected and
witnessed by a canvasser if the county clerk finds by a preponderance of the
evidence that the canvasser has violated Arkansas laws regarding canvassing,
perjury, forgery, or fraudulent practices in the procurement of petition
signatures or any provision of the Arkansas Constitution applicable to the
collection of signatures on a local option petition during the current
election cycle.
(2) This subsection shall not constrain the duties and authority
of the county clerk as set forth in Arkansas law.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 3-8-808(a), concerning the form of
verification for a petition for a local option election, is amended to read
as follows:
(a) Each petition containing signatures shall be verified in
substantially the following form by the canvasser's affidavit thereon as a
part thereof:
“State of Arkansas, County of _____________
I, _____________ (print name of canvasser) _____________, being duly
sworn, state that each of the foregoing persons signed his or her own name to
this sheet of the petition in my presence. To the best of my knowledge and
belief, each signature is genuine and each signer is a registered voter of
_____________ County, or City or Incorporated Town of _____________. At all
times during the circulation of this signature sheet, an exact copy of the
popular name, ballot title, and text was attached to the signature sheet, and
each signer read the ballot title of the petition or had the ballot title of
the petition read to the signer in my presence. My current residence address
is correctly stated below.
Signature_____________
Residence _____________
Indicate one: _____________ Paid Canvasser _____________
Volunteer/Unpaid Canvasser
Subscribed and sworn to before me this _____________day of
03/20/2025 4:20:24 PM SSS272

SB551
_____________, 20_____________
Signature_____________
Clerk, Notary, Judge, or Justice of the Peace
Seal_____________ ”.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 3-8-808 is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(e)(1) A canvasser who witnesses signatures on a petition part shall
view a copy of a potential petitioner's photo identification to verify the
identity of the potential petitioner before obtaining the signature.
(2) If a canvasser cannot verify the identity of the potential
petitioner, the canvasser shall not obtain a signature from the potential
petitioner.
(3) A canvasser who submits a canvasser affidavit under
subsection (a) of this section swearing that to the best of the affiant's
knowledge and belief each signature is genuine and that the person signing is
a legal voter, but does not comply with the requirements under subdivision
(e)(1) of this section, makes a false statement on the petition verification
form.
(4) As used in this subsection, "photo identification" means a
document or identification card permitted under § 7-1-101(40).

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 3-8-811(c), concerning the count of
signatures for a local option petition, is amended to read as follows:
(c) The following signatures shall not be counted for any purpose by
the official charged with verifying the signatures, including the initial
count of signatures:
(1) A signature that is not an original signature;
(2) A signature that is obviously not that of the purported
petitioner;
(3) A signature that is illegible and is accompanied by no
personally identifying information;
(4) A signature for which the corresponding printed name,
address, or birthdate is written by someone other than the signer except
under circumstances of disability of the signer; and
(5) A signature that has any other material defect that, on its
03/20/2025 4:20:24 PM SSS272

SB551
face, renders the signature invalid; and
(6) A signature submitted by a canvasser who has not filed a
true affidavit with the county clerk as required under subdivision (d)(1) of
this section certifying that the canvasser has complied with the Arkansas
Constitution and all Arkansas laws regarding canvassing, perjury, forgery,
and fraudulent practices in the procurement of petition signatures during the
current election cycle.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 3-8-811, concerning the count of signatures
for a local option petition, is amended to add additional subsections to read
as follows:
(d)(1) Except as provided under subdivision (d)(4) of this section, a
canvasser shall file a true affidavit with the county clerk certifying that
the canvasser has complied with the Arkansas Constitution and all Arkansas
laws regarding canvassing, perjury, forgery, and fraudulent practices in the
procurement of petition signatures during the current election cycle.
(2) The county clerk shall not count the signatures submitted
by the canvasser until a true affidavit is submitted under subdivision (d)(1)
of this section.
(3) A true affidavit submitted under subdivision (d)(1) of this
section shall have no bearing to establish the genuineness or falsity of the
signatures obtained by the canvasser.
(4)(A) The inability of a canvasser to submit an affidavit due
to death or medical disability shall not disqualify the signatures gathered
by the canvasser.
(B) Subdivision (d)(4)(A) of this section does not excuse
a canvasser from filing the affidavit required under § 3-8-808.
(e) A canvasser who has filed a true affidavit under subsection (d) of
this section shall not collect additional signatures unless the county clerk
determines that the sponsor of the local option petition is eligible to
solicit and add additional signatures to the local petition under § 14–14–
915(e).




03/20/2025 4:20:24 PM SSS272